Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB1089.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 880d. A judge of probate shall order that the payment of
any fee required under this chapter be waived or suspended, in
whole or in part, upon a showing by affidavit on a determination of
indigency. or inability to pay.The court shall determine indigency
in accordance with the process provided in section 1495.
SCS S05630'25 (S-1) 3cpvyb


Sec. 1495. (1) Before the imposition of any fine, cost, or
other assessment under section 8727 or 8827, section 1k of chapter
IX of the code of criminal procedure, 1927 PA 175, MCL 769.1k, or
section 907 of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.907,
the court must conduct an assessment of indigency using a 3-pronged
examination. An individual must be determined to be indigent if the
individual meets any of the following criteria:
(a) The individual is represented by appointed indigent
defense counsel under the Michigan indigent defense commission act,
2013 PA 93, MCL 780.981 to 780.1003, or is enrolled in public
assistance, including, but not limited to, food assistance;
temporary assistance for needy families; Medicaid; disability
insurance; women, infants, and children benefits; federal
supplemental security income; family independence program; or
public housing.
(b) The individual's income is at or below the very low income
threshold for the county in which the individual resides according
to the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development
Income Eligibility Calculator.
(c) The individual demonstrates financial hardship under an
individualized judicial review test, including, but not limited to,
consideration of 1 or more of the following:
(i) Household size.
(ii) Income source and amount.
(iii) Other relevant financial circumstances, medical expenses
or procedures, emergencies, or other existing debts.
(2) For an assessment of indigency under subsection (1)(a) and
(b), the trial court may request documentary evidence to establish
that indigency criteria are met or may rely on self-attestation. An
SCS S05630'25 (S-1) 3cpvyb


individual must be advised before sentencing that the individual
may provide the trial court with any evidence of limited financial
means or hardship.
(3) For an assessment of indigency under subsection (1)(c),
self-attestation of financial circumstances shall be presumed
sufficient proof. The trial court may exercise its discretion to
require documentary proof of an individual's stated circumstance,
but if the trial court requires proof, the trial court must
document the court's reasoning for the requirement on the record.
(4) Current incarceration of an individual creates a
presumption of the individual's indigency under this section.
(5) Except as otherwise provided by law, the indigency
standards in this section must also apply when determining an
individual's indigency for waiver of civil filing fees and court
costs.
Sec. 1496. (1) At sentencing, the trial court shall calculate
the court assessments owed by the defendant. Assessments may
include restitution to victims, fines within statutory ranges,
court costs, fees authorized by law, and reimbursements including,
but not limited to, plaintiff costs.
(2) Without regard to indigency, restitution must be imposed
where appropriate for the offense, under all of the following:
(a) Section 543x of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL
750.543x.
(b) Sections 1a(2), 3, and 34(6) of chapter IX of the code of
criminal procedure, 1927 PA 175, MCL 769.1a, 769.3, and 769.34.
(c) Section 3(1)(e) of chapter XI of the code of criminal
procedure, 1927 PA 175, MCL 771.3.
(d) Section 16(2) or 76(2) of the William Van Regenmorter
SCS S05630'25 (S-1) 3cpvyb


crime victim's rights act, 1985 PA 87, MCL 780.766 and 780.826.
(e) Any other applicable law.
(3) Fines and assessments imposed under section 5 of 1989 PA
196, MCL 780.905, for the purpose of victim payments under the
William Van Regenmorter crime victim's rights act, 1985 PA 87, MCL
780.751 to 780.834, may be imposed at the discretion of the court.
In determining whether a fine, an assessment imposed under section
5 of 1989 PA 196, MCL 780.905, or both, are appropriate
accountability measures, the trial court may consider the
individual's indigency and follow guidance provided by the state
court administrative office under the direction of the supreme
court about alternative sentencing measures that may provide more
appropriate accountability for indigent individuals.
(4) On a finding of indigency, the court shall not impose
costs, fees, and reimbursements including, but not limited to,
plaintiff costs.
(5) The trial court shall make a finding of indigency on the
record. The court shall make all findings regarding the court
assessments imposed or not imposed on the record.
Sec. 1497. (1) An individual may motion the trial court for
redetermination of indigency if the individual's financial
circumstances change after the individual has been sentenced. On a
request for redetermination, the trial court shall conduct a new
indigency assessment in accordance with the process set out in
section 1496. The trial court shall consider any evidence of change
in financial means.
(2) If the trial court finds that the individual is indigent
on redetermination under subsection (1), all of the following
apply:
SCS S05630'25 (S-1) 3cpvyb


(a) The trial court shall waive previously imposed court costs
and fees.
(b) The trial court may waive previously imposed fines at its
discretion.
(c) The trial court shall enter the waiver into the judicial
information services system, and any late fees that had been
imposed on that assessment must be waived.
(3) If the trial court waives a previously imposed assessment
under this section and the individual has already made payments
toward the assessment, the individual is not entitled to a
reimbursement of the payments.
Sec. 8727. (1) A municipal civil infraction is not a lesser
included offense of a criminal offense or an ordinance violation
that is not a civil infraction.
(2) If a defendant is determined to be responsible or
responsible "with explanation" for a municipal civil infraction,
the judge or district court magistrate may order the defendant to
pay a civil fine. , Beginning after the effective date of the
amendatory act that added section 1495, before ordering a defendant
to pay costs, assessments, damages, or expenses under this section,
the judge or district court magistrate shall conduct an indigency
assessment and make an indigency determination in accordance with
sections 1495 to 1497. If the judge or district court magistrate
finds that the defendant is indigent, the judge or district court
magistrate shall not order any costs, assessments, damages, or
expenses under this section. If the judge or district court
magistrate finds that the defendant is not indigent, the judge or
district court magistrate may order the defendant to pay costs as
provided in subsection (3), the justice system assessment as
SCS S05630'25 (S-1) 3cpvyb


provided in subsection (4), and, if applicable, damages and
expenses as provided in section 8733(2). In the order of judgment,
the judge or district court magistrate may grant a defendant
permission to pay a civil fine, costs, assessment, and damages and
expenses within a specified period of time or in specified
installments. Otherwise, the civil fine, costs, assessment, and
damages and expenses are due immediately.
(3) If a defendant is ordered to pay a civil fine found not
indigent under subsection (2), the judge or district court
magistrate shall may summarily tax and determine the costs of the
action, which are not limited to the costs taxable in ordinary
civil actions and may include all expenses, direct and indirect, to
which the plaintiff has been put in connection with the municipal
civil infraction, up to the entry of judgment. Costs of not more
than $500.00 shall must be ordered. Until September 30, 2003, the
amount of costs ordered shall must be not less than $9.00. Except
as otherwise provided by law, costs shall be are payable to the
general fund of the plaintiff.
(4) Effective October 1, 2003, in addition to any fine or cost
ordered to be paid under subsection (2), the judge or district
court magistrate shall may order the a defendant who is not
indigent to pay a justice system assessment of $10.00. Upon On
payment of the assessment, the clerk of the court shall transmit
the assessment collected to the state treasurer for deposit in the
justice system fund created in section 181.
(5) In addition to ordering the defendant to pay a civil fine,
costs, a justice system assessment, and damages and expenses, the
judge or district court magistrate may issue a writ or order under
section 8302.
SCS S05630'25 (S-1) 3cpvyb


(6) A district court magistrate shall impose the sanctions
permitted under subsections (2) and (5) only to the extent
expressly authorized by the chief judge or only judge of the
district court district.
(7) Each district of the district court and each municipal
court may establish a schedule of civil fines, costs, and
assessments to be imposed for municipal civil infractions that
occur within the district or city. If a schedule is established, it
shall must be prominently posted and readily available for public
inspection. A schedule need not include all municipal civil
infractions. A schedule may exclude cases on the basis of a
defendant's prior record of municipal civil infractions. If a
schedule is established, the schedule must make note of the
exception for indigent individuals and include the process for
determining indigency under sections 1495 to 1497.
(8) A default in the payment of a civil fine, costs,
assessment, or damages or expenses ordered under subsection (2),
(3), or (4) or an installment of the fine, costs, assessment, or
damages or expenses may be collected by a means authorized for the
enforcement of a judgment under chapter 40 or chapter 60.
(9) If a defendant fails to comply with an order or judgment
issued pursuant to under this section within the time prescribed by
the court, the court may proceed under section 8729, 8731 , or
8733, as applicable.
(10) A defendant who fails to answer a citation or notice to
appear in court for a municipal civil infraction is guilty of a
misdemeanor.
Sec. 8827. (1) A state civil infraction is not a lesser
included offense of a criminal offense.
SCS S05630'25 (S-1) 3cpvyb


(2) If a defendant is determined to be responsible or
responsible "with explanation" for a state civil infraction, the
judge or district court magistrate may order the defendant to pay a
civil fine as provided by law. and Beginning after the effective
date of the amendatory act that added section 1495, before ordering
a defendant to pay costs, assessments, damages, or expenses under
this section, the judge or district court magistrate shall conduct
an indigency assessment and make an indigency determination in
accordance with sections 1495 to 1497. If the judge or district
court magistrate finds that the defendant is indigent, the judge or
district court magistrate shall not order any costs, assessments,
damages, or expenses under this section. If the judge or district
court magistrate finds that the defendant is not indigent, the
judge or district court magistrate may order the defendant to pay
costs as provided in subsection (3) and the justice system
assessment provided in subsection (4). In the order of judgment,
the judge or district court magistrate may grant a defendant
permission to pay a civil fine, costs, and assessment within a
specified period of time or in specified installments. Otherwise,
the civil fine, costs, and assessment are payable immediately.
(3) If a defendant is ordered to pay a civil fine found not
indigent under subsection (2), the judge or district court
magistrate shall may summarily tax and determine the costs of the
action, which are not limited to the costs taxable in ordinary
civil actions and may include all expenses, direct and indirect, to
which the plaintiff has been put in connection with the state civil
infraction, up to the entry of judgment. Costs of not more than
$500.00 must may be ordered. Until September 30, 2003, the amount
of costs ordered must be not less than $9.00. Costs in a state
SCS S05630'25 (S-1) 3cpvyb


civil infraction action in the district court must be distributed
as provided in sections 8379 and 8381. Beginning October 1, 2003,
costs ordered in a state civil infraction action must be
distributed as provided in section 8379. Costs in a state civil
infraction action in a municipal court must be paid to the county.
(4) Effective October 1, 2003, in addition to any fine or cost
ordered to be paid under subsection (2) or (3), the judge or
district court magistrate shall may order the a defendant who is
not indigent to pay a justice system assessment of $10.00. Upon On
payment of the assessment, the clerk of the court shall transmit
the assessment collected to the state treasurer for deposit in the
justice system fund created in section 181.
(5) A district court magistrate shall impose the sanctions
permitted under subsection (2) only to the extent expressly
authorized by the chief judge or only judge of the district court
district.
(6) Each district of the district court and each municipal
court may establish a schedule of civil fines, costs, and
assessments to be imposed for state civil infractions that occur
within the district or city. If a schedule is established, it must
be prominently posted and readily available for public inspection.
A schedule need not include all violations that are designated by
law as state civil infractions. If a schedule is established, the
schedule must make note of the exception for indigent individuals
and include the process for determining indigency under sections
1495 to 1497.
(7) A default in the payment of a civil fine, costs, or
assessment ordered under subsection (2), (3), or (4) or an
installment of the fine, costs, or assessment may be collected by a
SCS S05630'25 (S-1) 3cpvyb


means authorized for the enforcement of a judgment under chapter 40
or chapter 60.
(8) A defendant who fails to comply with an order or judgment
issued under this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.
Enacting section 1. Sections 8729 and 8829 of the revised
judicature act of 1961, 1961 PA 236, MCL 600.8729 and 600.8829, are
repealed.
Enacting section 2. This amendatory act does not take effect
unless Senate Bill No. 1090 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted
into law.
Final Page
SCS S05630'25 (S-1) 3cpvyb